Maryland, session 2025, SB0924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–4011.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Unit” means the Juvenile Justice Monitoring Unit of the Office.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0924*

SENATE BILL 924
9–4013.
(a) The Unit shall include:
(1) a full–time Director of Juvenile Justice Monitoring; and
(2) staff, including juvenile justice monitors, as provided in the State
budget.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
FULL–TIME DIRECTOR OF JUVENILE JUSTICE MONITORING SHALL:
(I) BE APPOINTED BY THE CORRECTIONAL OMBUDSMAN; AND
(II) SERVE FOR A TERM OF 4 YEARS.
(2) IF THE CORRECTIONAL OMBUDSMAN APPOINTS A FULL–TIME
DIRECTOR OF JUVENILE JUSTICE MONITORING WHO HAS PREVIOUSLY SERVED IN
THAT ROLE, THE APPOINTMENT SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE ADVICE AND CONSENT
OF THE SENATE.
[(b)] (C) Salaries of the Director and juvenile justice monitors and expenses for
rent, equipment, supplies, and general operating expenses necessary for the work of the
Unit shall be as provided in the State budget.
[(c)] (D) In cooperation with the Secretary of Budget and Management, the
Correctional Ombudsman shall set minimum salaries, qualifications, and standards of
training and experience for positions with the Unit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.